Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2245
Probationer incentive program; pilot program; report.

(1) The probation administrator shall create a pilot program to establish a probationer incentive program as provided in this section.

(2) The pilot program shall be limited to a single probation district. Such district shall be chosen by the State Court Administrator.

(3) The pilot program shall establish an incentive fund to be used for the purchase of gift cards, vouchers, and other tangible rewards for probationers who are succeeding at probation, in order to encourage continued success and reduce recidivism. The incentives shall be awarded at the discretion of probation officers, subject to policies and guidelines of the office.

(4) On or before June 1, 2024, the probation administrator shall electronically submit a report to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature regarding the pilot program.

Laws 2023, LB50, § 14.